Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB553.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Gender transition services":
1. Means surgical, medical, mental health, or pharmaceutical services
that are performed for the purpose of altering the appearance of an
individual's sex or validating or affirming an individual's perception
of the individual's sex, if that appearance or perception is inconsistent
with the individual's sex;
2. Includes but is not limited to the following surgical, medical, mental
health, and pharmaceutical services, if performed for the purposes
stated in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph:
a. Prescribing or administering any drug, including testosterone,
estrogen, or progesterone;
b. Performing any sterilizing surgery, including castration,
hysterectomy, oophorectomy, orchiectomy, penectomy, and
vasectomy;
c. Performing any surgery that artificially constructs tissue having
the appearance of genitalia differing from the individual's sex,
including metoidioplasty, phalloplasty, and vaginoplasty;
d. Removing any healthy or non diseased body part or tissue; and
e. Providing any counseling or therapy; and
3. Does not include surgical, medical, mental health, or pharmaceutical
services provided to an individual:
a. Born with a medically verifiable disorder of sex development,
Page 1 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
including external biological sex characteristics that are
irresolvably ambiguous;
b. Diagnosed with a disorder of sexual development, if a health
care provider has determined, through genetic or biochemical
testing, that the individual does not have a sex chromosome
structure, sex steroid hormone production, or sex steroid
hormone action that is normal for a biological male or biological
female; or
c. Needing treatment for an infection, injury, disease, or disorder
that has been caused or exacerbated by surgical, medical, mental
health, or pharmaceutical services performed for the purposes
stated in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph;
(b) "Health care provider" means any person, agency, clinic, or facility that is:
1. Engaged in the rendering of any surgical, medical, mental health, or
pharmaceutical services; and
2. Licensed, certified, or otherwise regulated in this state or subject to
regulation in this state;
(c) "Health plan" means any policy, certificate, contract, or plan that offers or
provides coverage in this state for surgical, medical, mental health, or
pharmaceutical services:
1. By direct payment, reimbursement, or otherwise; and
2. On a fully insured or self-insured basis or any combination thereof;
(d) "Sex" means the biological indication of male and female as evidenced by
sex chromosomes, naturally occurring sex hormones, gonads, and
nonambiguous internal and external genitalia present at birth; and
(e) "State or local government" means this state or any local government of
this state, including:
Page 2 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
1. Any agency, board, bureau, department, council, commission,
committee, government corporation, institution, legislative body,
authority, hospital, clinic, political subdivision, instrumentality, or
other entity of this state;
2. Any city, county, charter county government, urban-county
government, consolidated local government, unified local government,
public school district, public institution of education, special district,
hospital district, or municipal corporation of this state; and
3. Any agency, board, bureau, department, council, commission,
committee, institution, legislative body, authority, hospital, clinic,
entity, or other instrumentality, of an entity referenced in
subparagraph 2. of this paragraph.
(2) A health care provider shall not:
(a) Render gender transition services to any individual in the course and scope
of employment by a state or local government; or
(b) Seek or accept payment or reimbursement for the rendering of gender
transition services to any individual from any of the following:
1. A state or local government, including:
a. A person contracted with a state or local government to provide
or administer a health plan; and
b. A health plan offered or sponsored by a state or local
government; or
2. A federal agency providing or administering Medicare benefits to or
on behalf of a Medicare beneficiary in this state, including a:
a. Person contracted with a federal agency to provide or administer
Medicare benefits in this state; and
b. Health plan that provides Medicare benefits that are publicly
Page 3 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
funded or subsidized.
(3) (a) State or local government funds shall not be directly or indirectly used,
granted, paid, or distributed to any entity, organization, or individual for the
provision or subsidy of any gender transition services.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection includes but is not limited to a prohibition
on the use of:
1. Any state or local government property, facility, or building to provide
or subsidize any gender transition services; and
2. Federal funds by a state or local government to provide or subsidize
any gender transition services.
(4) (a) If a licensing, certifying, or other regulatory authority for a health care
provider finds, in accordance with the agency's disciplinary and hearing
process, that a health care provider has violated this section, the authority
shall revoke the health care provider's licensure, certification, or other
authorization to provide services in this state.
(b) An intentional violation of this section by a public servant shall be a
violation of KRS 522.030.
Section 2. KRS 15.241 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Attorney General may seek injunctive relief as well as civil and criminal
penalties in courts of proper jurisdiction to prevent, penalize, and remedy violations
of:
(a) KRS Chapter 216B regarding abortion facilities and the administrative
regulations promulgated in furtherance thereof;
(b) KRS 311.710 to 311.830 regarding abortions and the administrative
regulations promulgated in furtherance thereof;[ and]
(c) KRS Chapter 39A and any orders or directives issued thereunder relating to
elective medical procedures, including but not limited to abortions; and
Page 4 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
(d) KRS 311.372 and Section 1 of this Act regarding gender transition services.
(2) Nothing in this section shall limit or preclude such authority as the secretary of the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services has to seek the relief set forth in subsection
(1) of this section.
Section 3. KRS 156.496 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Family resource and youth services centers shall be designed to meet the needs of
children and their families by providing services to enhance a student's ability to
succeed in school. If resources are limited, students and families who are the most
economically disadvantaged shall receive priority status for receiving services.
(2) Family resource centers shall be located in or near each elementary school in the
Commonwealth in which twenty percent (20%) or more of the student body are
eligible for free or reduced-price school meals. Family resource centers shall
promote identification and coordination of existing resources and shall include but
not be limited to the following core components for each site:
(a) Full-time preschool child care for children two (2) and three (3) years of age;
(b) After-school child care for children ages four (4) through twelve (12), with
the child care being full-time during the summer and on other days when
school is not in session;
(c) Families in training, which shall consist of an integrated approach to home
visits, group meetings, and monitoring child development for new and
expectant parents;
(d) Family literacy services as described in KRS 158.360 or a similar program
designed to provide opportunities for parents and children to learn together
and promote lifelong learning; and
(e) Health services or referrals to health services, or both.
(3) Youth services centers shall be located in or near each school in the
Commonwealth, except elementary schools, in which twenty percent (20%) or more
Page 5 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
of the student body are eligible for free or reduced-price school meals. Youth
services centers shall promote identification and coordination of existing resources
and shall include but not be limited to the following core components for each site:
(a) Referrals to health and social services;
(b) Career exploration and development;
(c) Summer and part-time job development for high school students;
(d) Substance abuse education and counseling; and
(e) Family crisis and mental health counseling.
(4) A grant program is hereby established to provide financial assistance to eligible
school districts to establish or maintain family resource or youth services centers.
The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall award grants pursuant to KRS
156.4977. Funding provided to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for the
grant program and agency administrative costs shall include an increase that is
equal to or greater than the general fund growth factor provided in agency budget
instructions.
(5) A family resource or youth services center that receives funding for one (1) year or
more shall not be considered ineligible for funding based solely on the percent of
the student body eligible for free or reduced-price school meals unless the percent
of the student body eligible for free or reduced-price school meals is below twenty
percent (20%) for five (5) consecutive years.
(6) A school district shall not operate a family resource center or a youth services
center that:
(a) Provides abortion counseling or gender transition services, as defined in
Section 1 of this Act; or
(b) Makes referrals to a health care facility for the purpose of seeking an abortion
or gender transition services, as defined in Section 1 of this Act.
(7) A school district may accept monetary donations for the operation and maintenance
Page 6 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
of family resource and youth services centers. Any donations given to the school
district for the operation and maintenance of family resource and youth services
centers shall be used only for the operation and maintenance of family resource and
youth services centers, and for no other purpose.
Section 4. KRS 39A.180 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The political subdivisions of the state and other agencies designated or appointed by
the Governor may make, amend, and rescind orders and promulgate administrative
regulations necessary for disaster and emergency response purposes, and to
supplement the carrying out of the provisions of this chapter, if not inconsistent
with any orders or administrative regulations promulgated by the Governor or by
any state agency exercising a power delegated to it by the Governor.
(2) (a) All written orders and administrative regulations promulgated by the
Governor, the director, or by any political subdivision or other agency
authorized by KRS Chapters 39A to 39F to make orders and promulgate
administrative regulations, shall have the full force of law and, if promulgated
as administrative regulations, shall follow the requirements for promulgating
administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A. All written orders
authorized by KRS Chapters 39A to 39F shall be filed with the Legislative
Research Commission.
(b) The Governor may suspend a statute by executive order when an emergency
is declared under this chapter if:
1. The statute is specifically enumerated by the Governor in the executive
order; and
2. The executive order specifying the suspension is approved by the
Attorney General in writing.
(c) A statute suspension authorized in paragraph (b) of this subsection shall only
be in effect while the emergency executive order is in effect.
Page 7 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
(d) Any existing administrative regulation that conflicts with a written order
issued under this chapter shall be amended, withdrawn, or repealed in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to conform with the written order.
(e) When a written order ends, any administrative regulation promulgated under
the authority of this section shall:
1. Become void; and
2. Be withdrawn, amended, or repealed in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the Governor shall not suspend any
laws in KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, Chapter 13A, 446.350, 527.020, 311.372,
Section 1 of this Act, 311.710 to 311.820, or any other statutes related to abortion
or gender transition services, as defined in Section 1 of this Act.
(4) The law enforcement authorities of the state and of its counties, urban-counties,
charter counties, and cities shall enforce the written orders and administrative
regulations issued pursuant to KRS Chapters 39A to 39F.
Section 5. KRS 205.5365 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "gender transition services" has the same meaning as in
Section 1 of this Act.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and unless required under
federal law, the Department for Medicaid Services,[ and] any managed care
organization with whom the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid
services, and the state's medical assistance program are hereby prohibited from
expending any Medicaid funds on, or providing benefits or coverage for, gender
transition services, including but not limited to[ any of the following]:
(a)[(1)] Cross-sex hormones when prescribed or administered primarily or solely
for the treatment of gender dysphoria; and
(b)[(2)] Gender reassignment surgery to alter or remove physical or anatomical
Page 8 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
characteristics or features that are typical for and characteristic of a person's
biological sex.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 205.6481 TO 205.6495 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Gender transition services" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this
Act; and
(b) "KCHIP" means:
1. The state child health plan known as the Kentucky Children's Health
Insurance Program; or
2. Any plan submitted for federal approval of a children's health
insurance program for Kentucky under Title XXI of the Federal
Social Security Act.
(2) KCHIP shall not reimburse or provide benefits or coverage for gender transition
services.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 17A OF KRS CHAPTER 304
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, the following have the same meaning as in Section 1 of
this Act:
(a) "Gender transition services";
(b) "Health plan"; and
(c) "State or local government."
(2) All of the following shall not reimburse or provide benefits or coverage for
gender transition services:
(a) A health plan offered or sponsored by a state or local government; and
(b) A health plan, including Medicare supplement insurance, that provides
Medicare benefits that are publicly funded or subsidized.
Page 9 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
Section 8. KRS 18A.225 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The term "employee" for purposes of this section means:
1. Any person, including an elected public official, who is regularly
employed by any department, office, board, agency, or branch of state
government; or by a public postsecondary educational institution; or by
any city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government, whose legislative body has opted to participate in the state-
sponsored health insurance program pursuant to KRS 79.080; and who
is either a contributing member to any one (1) of the retirement systems
administered by the state, including but not limited to the Kentucky
Retirement Systems, County Employees Retirement System, Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System, the Legislators' Retirement Plan, or the
Judicial Retirement Plan; or is receiving a contractual contribution from
the state toward a retirement plan; or, in the case of a public
postsecondary education institution, is an individual participating in an
optional retirement plan authorized by KRS 161.567; or is eligible to
participate in a retirement plan established by an employer who ceases
participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System pursuant to
KRS 61.522 whose employees participated in the health insurance plans
administered by the Personnel Cabinet prior to the employer's effective
cessation date in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System;
2. Any certified or classified employee of a local board of education or a
public charter school as defined in KRS 160.1590;
3. Any elected member of a local board of education;
4. Any person who is a present or future recipient of a retirement
allowance from the Kentucky Retirement Systems, County Employees
Retirement System, Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, the
Page 10 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
Legislators' Retirement Plan, the Judicial Retirement Plan, or the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System's optional
retirement plan authorized by KRS 161.567, except that a person who is
receiving a retirement allowance and who is age sixty-five (65) or older
shall not be included, with the exception of persons covered under KRS
61.702(2)(b)3. and 78.5536(2)(b)3., unless he or she is actively
employed pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph; and
5. Any eligible dependents and beneficiaries of participating employees
and retirees who are entitled to participate in the state-sponsored health
insurance program;
(b) The term "health benefit plan" for the purposes of this section means a health
benefit plan as defined in KRS 304.17A-005;
(c) The term "insurer" for the purposes of this section means an insurer as defined
in KRS 304.17A-005; and
(d) The term "managed care plan" for the purposes of this section means a
managed care plan as defined in KRS 304.17A-500.
(2) (a) The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, upon the
recommendation of the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet, shall procure, in
compliance with the provisions of KRS 45A.080, 45A.085, and 45A.090,
from one (1) or more insurers authorized to do business in this state, a group
health benefit plan that may include but not be limited to health maintenance
organization (HMO), preferred provider organization (PPO), point of service
(POS), and exclusive provider organization (EPO) benefit plans
encompassing all or any class or classes of employees. With the exception of
employers governed by the provisions of KRS Chapters 16, 18A, and 151B,
all employers of any class of employees or former employees shall enter into
a contract with the Personnel Cabinet prior to including that group in the state
Page 11 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
health insurance group. The contracts shall include but not be limited to
designating the entity responsible for filing any federal forms, adoption of
policies required for proper plan administration, acceptance of the contractual
provisions with health insurance carriers or third-party administrators, and
adoption of the payment and reimbursement methods necessary for efficient
administration of the health insurance program. Health insurance coverage
provided to state employees under this section shall, at a minimum, contain
the same benefits as provided under Kentucky Kare Standard as of January 1,
1994, and shall include a mail-order drug option as provided in subsection
(13) of this section. All employees and other persons for whom the health care
coverage is provided or made available shall annually be given an option to
elect health care coverage through a self-funded plan offered by the
Commonwealth or, if a self-funded plan is not available, from a list of
coverage options determined by the competitive bid process under the
provisions of KRS 45A.080, 45A.085, and 45A.090 and made available
during annual open enrollment.
(b) The policy or policies shall be approved by the commissioner of insurance
and may contain the provisions the commissioner of insurance approves,
whether or not otherwise permitted by the insurance laws.
(c) Any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall agree to
provide coverage to all members of the state group, including active
employees and retirees and their eligible covered dependents and
beneficiaries, within the county or counties specified in its bid. Except as
provided in subsection (20) of this section, any carrier bidding to offer health
care coverage to employees shall also agree to rate all employees as a single
entity, except for those retirees whose former employers insure their active
employees outside the state-sponsored health insurance program and as
Page 12 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
otherwise provided in KRS 61.702(2)(b)3.b. and 78.5536(2)(b)3.b.
(d) Any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall agree to
provide enrollment, claims, and utilization data to the Commonwealth in a
format specified by the Personnel Cabinet with the understanding that the data
shall be owned by the Commonwealth; to provide data in an electronic form
and within a time frame specified by the Personnel Cabinet; and to be subject
to penalties for noncompliance with data reporting requirements as specified
by the Personnel Cabinet. The Personnel Cabinet shall take strict precautions
to protect the confidentiality of each individual employee; however,
confidentiality assertions shall not relieve a carrier from the requirement of
providing stipulated data to the Commonwealth.
(e) The Personnel Cabinet shall develop the necessary techniques and capabilities
for timely analysis of data received from carriers and, to the extent possible,
provide in the request-for-proposal specifics relating to data requirements,
electronic reporting, and penalties for noncompliance. The Commonwealth
shall own the enrollment, claims, and utilization data provided by each carrier
and shall develop methods to protect the confidentiality of the individual. The
Personnel Cabinet shall include in the October annual report submitted
pursuant to the provisions of KRS 18A.226 to the Governor, the General
Assembly, and the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, an analysis of the
financial stability of the program, which shall include but not be limited to
loss ratios, methods of risk adjustment, measurements of carrier quality of
service, prescription coverage and cost management, and statutorily required
mandates. If state self-insurance was available as a carrier option, the report
also shall provide a detailed financial analysis of the self-insurance fund
including but not limited to loss ratios, reserves, and reinsurance agreements.
(f) If any agency participating in the state-sponsored employee health insurance
Page 13 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
program for its active employees terminates participation and there is a state
appropriation for the employer's contribution for active employees' health
insurance coverage, then neither the agency nor the employees shall receive
the state-funded contribution after termination from the state-sponsored
employee health insurance program.
(g) Any funds in flexible spending accounts that remain after all reimbursements
have been processed shall be transferred to the credit of the state-sponsored
health insurance plan's appropriation account.
(h) Each entity participating in the state-sponsored health insurance program shall
provide an amount at least equal to the state contribution rate for the employer
portion of the health insurance premium. For any participating entity that used
the state payroll system, the employer contribution amount shall be equal to
but not greater than the state contribution rate.
(3) The premiums may be paid by the policyholder:
(a) Wholly from funds contributed by the employee, by payroll deduction or
otherwise;
(b) Wholly from funds contributed by any department, board, agency, public
postsecondary education institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county,
charter county, county, or consolidated local government; or
(c) Partly from each, except that any premium due for health care coverage or
dental coverage, if any, in excess of the premium amount contributed by any
department, board, agency, postsecondary education institution, or branch of
state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government for any other health care coverage shall be paid by the employee.
(4) If an employee moves his or her place of residence or employment out of the
service area of an insurer offering a managed health care plan, under which he or
she has elected coverage, into either the service area of another managed health care
Page 14 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
plan or into an area of the Commonwealth not within a managed health care plan
service area, the employee shall be given an option, at the time of the move or
transfer, to change his or her coverage to another health benefit plan.
(5) No payment of premium by any department, board, agency, public postsecondary
educational institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county, charter county,
county, or consolidated local government shall constitute compensation to an
insured employee for the purposes of any statute fixing or limiting the
compensation of such an employee. Any premium or other expense incurred by any
department, board, agency, public postsecondary educational institution, or branch
of state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government shall be considered a proper cost of administration.
(6) The policy or policies may contain the provisions with respect to the class or classes
of employees covered, amounts of insurance or coverage for designated classes or
groups of employees, policy options, terms of eligibility, and continuation of
insurance or coverage after retirement.
(7) Group rates under this section shall be made available to the disabled child of an
employee regardless of the child's age if the entire premium for the disabled child's
coverage is paid by the state employee. A child shall be considered disabled if he or
she has been determined to be eligible for federal Social Security disability benefits.
(8) The health care contract or contracts for employees shall be entered into for a
period of not less than one (1) year.
(9) The secretary shall appoint thirty-two (32) persons to an Advisory Committee of
State Health Insurance Subscribers to advise the secretary or the secretary's
designee regarding the state-sponsored health insurance program for employees.
The secretary shall appoint, from a list of names submitted by appointing
authorities, members representing school districts from each of the seven (7)
Supreme Court districts, members representing state government from each of the
Page 15 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
seven (7) Supreme Court districts, two (2) members representing retirees under age
sixty-five (65), one (1) member representing local health departments, two (2)
members representing the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, and three (3)
members at large. The secretary shall also appoint two (2) members from a list of
five (5) names submitted by the Kentucky Education Association, two (2) members
from a list of five (5) names submitted by the largest state employee organization of
nonschool state employees, two (2) members from a list of five (5) names submitted
by the Kentucky Association of Counties, two (2) members from a list of five (5)
names submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities, and two (2) members from a
list of names consisting of five (5) names submitted by each state employee
organization that has two thousand (2,000) or more members on state payroll
deduction. The advisory committee shall be appointed in January of each year and
shall meet quarterly.
(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the policy or policies
provided to employees pursuant to this section shall not provide coverage for
obtaining or performing an abortion, nor shall any state funds be used for the
purpose of obtaining or performing an abortion on behalf of employees or their
dependents.
(11) Interruption of an established treatment regime with maintenance drugs shall be
grounds for an insured to appeal a formulary change through the established appeal
procedures approved by the Department of Insurance, if the physician supervising
the treatment certifies that the change is not in the best interests of the patient.
(12) Any employee who is eligible for and elects to participate in the state health
insurance program as a retiree, or the spouse or beneficiary of a retiree, under any
one (1) of the state-sponsored retirement systems shall not be eligible to receive the
state health insurance contribution toward health care coverage as a result of any
other employment for which there is a public employer contribution. This does not
Page 16 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
preclude a retiree and an active employee spouse from using both contributions to
the extent needed for purchase of one (1) state sponsored health insurance policy
for that plan year.
(13) (a) The policies of health insurance coverage procured under subsection (2) of
this section shall include a mail-order drug option for maintenance drugs for
state employees. Maintenance drugs may be dispensed by mail order in
accordance with Kentucky law.
(b) A health insurer shall not discriminate against any retail pharmacy located
within the geographic coverage area of the health benefit plan and that meets
the terms and conditions for participation established by the insurer, including
price, dispensing fee, and copay requirements of a mail-order option. The
retail pharmacy shall not be required to dispense by mail.
(c) The mail-order option shall not permit the dispensing of a controlled
substance classified in Schedule II.
(14) The policy or policies provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to
this section shall provide coverage for obtaining a hearing aid and acquiring hearing
aid-related services for insured individuals under eighteen (18) years of age, subject
to a cap of one thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400) every thirty-six (36) months
pursuant to KRS 304.17A-132.
(15) Any policy provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this section
shall provide coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of autism spectrum disorders
consistent with KRS 304.17A-142.
(16) Any policy provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this section
shall provide coverage for obtaining amino acid-based elemental formula pursuant
to KRS 304.17A-258.
(17) If a state employee's residence and place of employment are in the same county,
and if the hospital located within that county does not offer surgical services,
Page 17 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
intensive care services, obstetrical services, level II neonatal services, diagnostic
cardiac catheterization services, and magnetic resonance imaging services, the
employee may select a plan available in a contiguous county that does provide
those services, and the state contribution for the plan shall be the amount available
in the county where the plan selected is located.
(18) If a state employee's residence and place of employment are each located in
counties in which the hospitals do not offer surgical services, intensive care
services, obstetrical services, level II neonatal services, diagnostic cardiac
catheterization services, and magnetic resonance imaging services, the employee
may select a plan available in a county contiguous to the county of residence that
does provide those services, and the state contribution for the plan shall be the
amount available in the county where the plan selected is located.
(19) The Personnel Cabinet is encouraged to study whether it is fair and reasonable and
in the best interests of the state group to allow any carrier bidding to offer health
care coverage under this section to submit bids that may vary county by county or
by larger geographic areas.
(20) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the bid for proposals for health
insurance coverage for calendar year 2004 shall include a bid scenario that reflects
the statewide rating structure provided in calendar year 2003 and a bid scenario that
allows for a regional rating structure that allows carriers to submit bids that may
vary by region for a given product offering as described in this subsection:
(a) The regional rating bid scenario shall not include a request for bid on a
statewide option;
(b) The Personnel Cabinet shall divide the state into geographical regions which
shall be the same as the partnership regions designated by the Department for
Medicaid Services for purposes of the Kentucky Health Care Partnership
Program established pursuant to 907 KAR 1:705;
Page 18 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
(c) The request for proposal shall require a carrier's bid to include every county
within the region or regions for which the bid is submitted and include but not
be restricted to a preferred provider organization (PPO) option;
(d) If the Personnel Cabinet accepts a carrier's bid, the cabinet shall award the
carrier all of the counties included in its bid within the region. If the Personnel
Cabinet deems the bids submitted in accordance with this subsection to be in
the best interests of state employees in a region, the cabinet may award the
contract for that region to no more than two (2) carriers; and
(e) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the Personnel Cabinet from including
other requirements or criteria in the request for proposal.
(21) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed on or
after July 12, 2006, to public employees pursuant to this section which provides
coverage for services rendered by a physician or osteopath duly licensed under KRS
Chapter 311 that are within the scope of practice of an optometrist duly licensed
under the provisions of KRS Chapter 320 shall provide the same payment of
coverage to optometrists as allowed for those services rendered by physicians or
osteopaths.
(22) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed to
public employees pursuant to this section shall comply with:
(a) KRS 304.12-237;
(b) KRS 304.17A-270 and 304.17A-525;
(c) KRS 304.17A-600 to 304.17A-633;
(d) KRS 205.593;
(e) KRS 304.17A-700 to 304.17A-730;
(f) KRS 304.14-135;
(g) KRS 304.17A-580 and 304.17A-641;
(h) KRS 304.99-123;
Page 19 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
(i) KRS 304.17A-138;
(j) KRS 304.17A-148;
(k) KRS 304.17A-163 and 304.17A-1631;
(l) KRS 304.17A-265;
(m) KRS 304.17A-261;
(n) KRS 304.17A-262;
(o) KRS 304.17A-145;
(p) KRS 304.17A-129;
(q) KRS 304.17A-133;
(r) KRS 304.17A-264; and
(s) Administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to statutes listed in this
subsection.
(23) (a) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed to
public employees pursuant to this section shall provide a special enrollment
period to pregnant women who are eligible for coverage in accordance with
the requirements set forth in KRS 304.17-182.
(b) The Department of Employee Insurance shall, at or before the time a public
employee is initially offered the opportunity to enroll in the plan or coverage,
provide the employee a notice of the special enrollment rights under this
subsection.
(24) (a) As used in this subsection, "gender transition services" has the same
meaning as in Section 1 of this Act.
(b) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed
to public employees pursuant to this section shall not reimburse or provide
benefits or coverage for gender transition services.
(c) State or local government funds shall not be used to provide or subsidize
gender transition services to public employees or their dependents.
Page 20 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
Section 9. KRS 164.2871 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The governing board of each state postsecondary educational institution is
authorized to purchase liability insurance for the protection of the individual
members of the governing board, faculty, and staff of such institutions from liability
for acts and omissions committed in the course and scope of the individual's
employment or service. Each institution may purchase the type and amount of
liability coverage deemed to best serve the interest of such institution.
(2) All retirement annuity allowances accrued or accruing to any employee of a state
postsecondary educational institution through a retirement program sponsored by
the state postsecondary educational institution are hereby exempt from any state,
county, or municipal tax, and shall not be subject to execution, attachment,
garnishment, or any other process whatsoever, nor shall any assignment thereof be
enforceable in any court. Except retirement benefits accrued or accruing to any
employee of a state postsecondary educational institution through a retirement
program sponsored by the state postsecondary educational institution on or after
January 1, 1998, shall be subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.020, to the extent
provided in KRS 141.010 and 141.0215.
(3) Except as provided in KRS Chapter 44, the purchase of liability insurance for
members of governing boards, faculty and staff of institutions of higher education
in this state shall not be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity or any
other immunity or privilege.
(4) The governing board of each state postsecondary education institution is authorized
to provide a self-insured employer group health plan to its employees, which plan
shall:
(a) Conform to the requirements of Subtitle 32 of KRS Chapter 304; and
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, be exempt from
conformity with Subtitle 17A of KRS Chapter 304.
Page 21 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
(5) A self-insured employer group health plan provided by the governing board of a
state postsecondary education institution to its employees shall comply with:
(a) KRS 304.17A-129;
(b) KRS 304.17A-133;
(c) KRS 304.17A-145;
(d) KRS 304.17A-163 and 304.17A-1631;
(e) KRS 304.17A-261;
(f) KRS 304.17A-262;
(g) KRS 304.17A-264; and
(h) KRS 304.17A-265.
(6) (a) A self-insured employer group health plan provided by the governing board of
a state postsecondary education institution to its employees shall provide a
special enrollment period to pregnant women who are eligible for coverage in
accordance with the requirements set forth in KRS 304.17-182.
(b) The governing board of a state postsecondary education institution shall, at or
before the time an employee is initially offered the opportunity to enroll in the
plan or coverage, provide the employee a notice of the special enrollment
rights under this subsection.
(7) (a) As used in this subsection, "gender transition services" has the same
meaning as in Section 1 of this Act.
(b) A self-insured employer group health plan provided by the governing board
of a state postsecondary education institution to its employees shall not
reimburse or provide benefits or coverage for gender transition services.
(c) State or local government funds shall not be used to provide or subsidize
gender transition services to state postsecondary education institution
employees or their dependents.
Section 10. KRS 304.17C-125 is amended to read as follows:
Page 22 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
The following shall apply to limited health service benefit plans, including any limited
health service contract, as defined in KRS 304.38A-010:
(1) KRS 304.17A-129;
(2) KRS 304.17A-262;[ and]
(3) KRS 304.17A-591 to 304.17A-599; and
(4) Section 7 of this Act.
Section 11. KRS 605.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any child committed to or in the custody of the cabinet or the Department of
Juvenile Justice who is not placed in a location where smoking cessation
services are provided may participate in smoking cessation services offered by
local health departments or their contracted agents at no cost.
(b) Unless provided otherwise, when any child committed to or in the custody of
the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet requires medical or surgical
care or treatment, the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet may
provide the same or arrange for the furnishing thereof by other public or
private agencies, and may give consent to the medical or surgical treatment.
For this purpose, the services and facilities of local health officers and
departments shall be made available, at a cost not to exceed the Medicaid
reimbursement rate, to the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, and
as far as practicable, any publicly owned hospital shall provide hospitalization
without charge for any such child who is a resident of the political subdivision
by which the hospital is owned or operated. This section does not authorize
nor shall permission be granted for abortion,[ or] sterilization, or gender
transition services, as defined in Section 1 of this Act.
(2) Any child placed in a foster home by an agency duly authorized in KRS Chapter
620 to place a child in a foster home shall receive a complete medical, visual, and
dental examination by a professional authorized by the Kentucky Revised Statutes
Page 23 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
to conduct such examinations. Arrangements for a child placed in a foster home to
receive such examinations shall be made within two (2) weeks of his placement in a
foster home and not less than every twelve (12) months thereafter.
(3) Children maintained in any of the facilities and programs operated or contracted by
the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet shall, so far as possible, receive a
common school education.
(a) The Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children shall be
established to serve children in facilities and programs operated or contracted
by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services, residential, day treatment, clinical, and group home programs. All
policies and procedures necessary to educate state agency children shall be
approved by the Kentucky Board of Education. All duties, responsibilities,
rights, and privileges specifically imposed on or granted to the local education
administration units shall be imposed on or granted to the Department of
Juvenile Justice or the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and contracted
agencies with regard to educating agency children. Classrooms for the
Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children shall be
within or near the facilities and programs operated or contracted by the
Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet. The Kentucky Department of
Education, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services, Department for Community Based Services, shall develop a
biennial plan regarding the educational needs and provisions of educational
programs, with emphasis on the coordination of all treatment services and
funds available to provide for the education of state agency children. The
biennial plan shall include strategies to assure that teacher preparation
programs include content related to working with state agency children and
that adequate professional development opportunities for better meeting the
Page 24 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
needs of these students are available for teachers and schools.
(b) Teachers and other staff shall be hired on contract through a local school
district or if a local school district is not willing to participate, teachers may
be hired by the Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency
Children or a contract may be entered into with a private provider of
educational services. All certified educational staff hired by the Kentucky
Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children shall be members of the
Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System.
(c) Beginning July 1, 1993, the Kentucky Education Collaborative for State
Agency Children shall be financed through:
1. The amount generated by state agency children under the Support
Education Excellence in Kentucky program as provided in KRS 157.360
for the guaranteed base and adjustments for the number of at-risk
students, exceptional students, and transportation costs;
2. A per-pupil distribution of professional development funds with the
collaborative serving as a consortium for state agency children;
3. A per-pupil distribution of technology funds in accordance with the state
education technology plan pursuant to KRS 156.670 and the formula for
the distribution of funds to local school districts;
4. A per-pupil distribution of textbook funds pursuant to KRS 157.100 and
157.190;
5. The funding for school services for state agency children authorized by
KRS 158.135; and
6. Other grants and entitlements, including federal funds, identified in the
implementation plan developed pursuant to paragraph (f) of this
subsection for the education of Kentucky's children.
(d) The commissioner of Juvenile Justice and the secretary of the Cabinet for
Page 25 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
Health and Family Services shall promulgate administrative regulations,
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, with the assistance of the Kentucky
Department of Education and upon recommendation of the Kentucky Board
of Education regarding the governance, curriculum, and other topics
necessary to educate state agency children. The regulations shall:
1. Provide for the development and implementation of interagency
agreements that:
a. Define the financial responsibility of each state and local agency
for providing services to state agency children;
b. Establish procedures for resolving interagency disputes among
agencies that are parties to the agreements; and
2. Provide procedures for the implementation of the Kentucky statutes
regarding school-based decision making, student outcomes,
accountability, assessment, rewards and sanctions, technology, staff
development, salaries, and the development of coordinated individual
treatment, education, and transition plans to ensure compliance with
present education and treatment laws and regulations specific to the
needs of children in the programs of the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services.
(e) When the placement of a state agency child is changed so that the state agency
child must transfer from one school or educational facility to a different
school or educational facility, the school or educational facility that the state
agency child is leaving shall, within two (2) days of the state agency child
leaving, prepare an educational passport for the child, which shall be
delivered to the cabinet or the Department of Juvenile Justice. The cabinet or
the Department of Juvenile Justice shall, within two (2) days of enrolling a
state agency child in a new school or educational facility, present the
Page 26 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1920
educational passport to the receiving school or educational facility.
(f) The commissioner of Juvenile Justice and the secretary of the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services and the commissioner of the state Department of
Education shall initiate development of a plan for implementation of the
Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children.
Section 12. The General Assembly finds that it would not be in the interest of
public health or welfare to use or receive public funds, or for public entities to offer or
sponsor health plans that provide benefits or coverage, for gender transition services due
to the substantial risks and known harmful effects of those services, including irreversible
physical alterations and, in some cases, sterility and lifelong sexual dysfunction.
Section 13. If any provision of this Act, or this Act's application to any person
or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act, which shall be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions and applications of this Act are severable.
Section 14. Sections 7 to 10 of this Act apply to health plans issued or renewed
on or after the effective date of this Act.
Page 27 of 27
XXXX 2/2/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed